Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5547XD (5) 91 je/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 85.67, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The attorney general shall appoint a staff member 3 to represent the treasurer of state and the fund in all 4 proceedings and matters arising under this subchapter . The 5 attorney general shall be reimbursed up to four hundred fifty 6 nine hundred thousand dollars annually from the fund for 7 services provided related to the fund. The reimbursement 8 amount shall be adjusted annually to reflect any increase in 9 the consumer price index, as tabulated by the federal bureau of 10 labor statistics, rounded to the nearest five dollars, since 11 the previous reimbursement. The commissioner of insurance 12 shall consider the reimbursement to the attorney general as an 13 outstanding liability when making a determination of funding 14 availability under section 85.65A, subsection 2 . 15